Utah statutes.
63G-6-817.   Statutes of limitations.
(1)  Any action under Subsection 63G-6-815(1)(a) shall be initiated as
follows:
(a)  within 20 calendar days after the aggrieved person knows or should have
known of the facts giving rise to the action; provided, however, that an
action with respect to an invitation for bids or request for proposals shall
be initiated prior to the opening of bids or the closing date for proposals
unless the aggrieved person did not know and should not have known of the
facts giving rise to the action prior to bid opening or the closing date for
proposals; or
(b)  within 14 calendar days after receipt of a final administrative decision
pursuant to either Section 63G-6-806 or Section 63G-6-813, whichever is
applicable.
(2)  Any action under Subsection 63G-6-815(1)(b) shall be commenced within six
months after receipt of a final administrative decision pursuant to Section
63G-6-806 or Section 63G-6-813, whichever is applicable.
(3)  The statutory limitations on an action between private persons on a
contract or for breach of contract shall apply to any action commenced
pursuant to Subsection 63G-6-815(1)(c), except notice of appeals from the
Procurement Appeals Board pursuant to Section 63G-6-814 concerning actions on
a contract or for breach of contract shall be filed within one year after the
date of the Procurement Appeals Board decision.
